Nebraska, session 109, LB1165A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $2,000,000 from the Site and
Building Development Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from the Site and Building
Development Fund for FY2027-28 to the Department of Economic Development, for
Program 603, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1165,
One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$2,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2027-28 $-0- Cash
Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-